Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Miscellaneous Prohibited Acts.

Sec. 39.90.010.
Obstruction of access to public information.

A public employee may not be dismissed, demoted, suspended, laid off, or otherwise made subject to any disciplinary action for communicating matters of public record or information under AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

.

In this section, “public employee” means any employee receiving compensation for services provided to the state, including the University of Alaska, or any political subdivision of the state.

A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 151 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.51.020

. Renumbered in 1987.

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120.

Cross references. —

For provision that the crime defined in this section is a class A misdemeanor, see AS

11.81.250(c)

; for penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 39.90.020.
Nepotism prohibited.

It is unlawful for a person who is the spouse of or is related by blood within and including the second degree of kindred to the executive head of a principal state department or agency to be employed in that department or agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.10.010

. Renumbered as AS 39.51.030 in 1984. Renumbered again in 1987.